Indiana, session 2026, HB1084.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-40-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.264-2017,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "distributed
generation" means electricity produced by a generator or other device
that is:
(1) located on the customer's premises;
(2) owned by the customer;
(3) sized at a nameplate capacity of the lesser of:
(A) not more than one (1) megawatt; or
(B) the customer's average annual consumption of electricity
on the premises; and
(4) interconnected and operated in parallel with the electricity
supplier's facilities in accordance with the commission's approved
interconnection standards.
(b) The term does not include electricity produced by the following:
(1) An electric generator used exclusively for emergency
purposes.
2026 IN 1084—LS 6473/DI 101


(2) A net metering facility (as defined in 170 IAC 4-4.2-1(k))
operating under a net metering tariff.
(3) A plug-in solar power system (as defined in IC 8-1-40.2-4).
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-40.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 40.2. Plug-In Solar Power Systems
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to the
Indiana utility regulatory commission created by IC 8-1-1-2.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "customer" means a person that
receives retail electric service from an electricity supplier.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "electricity supplier" has the
meaning set forth in IC 8-1-2.3-2.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "plug-in solar power system"
means a moveable photovoltaic generation device that:
(1) has a maximum power output of not more than one
thousand two hundred (1,200) watts;
(2) is designed to be connected to a building's electrical system
through a standard outlet; and
(3) is intended primarily to offset part of a customer's
electricity consumption in the building in which it is used.
Sec. 5. A plug-in solar power system is exempt from the
commission's interconnection standards set forth in 170 IAC 4-4.3.
Sec. 6. A plug-in solar power system must include a
functionality or feature that:
(1) is activated during a loss of electrical power to the building
in which the plug-in solar power system is used; and
(2) prevents the plug-in solar power system from exporting
any power beyond the meter during the loss of electrical
power to the building.
Sec. 7. (a) This section applies to a plug-in solar power system
that:
(1) meets the requirements of section 6 of this chapter;
(2) meets the standards of the most recent version of the
National Electrical Code; and
(3) is certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent
nationally recognized testing laboratory.
(b) An electricity supplier may not require a customer to do any
of the following with respect to a plug-in solar power system
described in subsection (a):
(1) Obtain the electricity supplier's approval before installing
or using the plug-in solar power system.
2026 IN 1084—LS 6473/DI 101


(2) Pay any fee or charge related to the installation or use of
the plug-in solar power system.
(3) Install any additional controls or equipment, beyond what
is integrated into the electrical system of the customer's
building, in connection with the installation or use of the
plug-in solar power system.
Sec. 8. An electricity supplier is not liable for any injury or
damages caused by a customer's installation or use of a plug-in
solar power system.
SECTION 3. IC 34-30-2.1-77.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 77.6. IC 8-1-40.2-8 (Concerning
an electricity supplier for any injury or damages caused by a
customer's installation or use of a plug-in solar power system).
2026 IN 1084—LS 6473/DI 101